Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4203
Definitions, where found.

For the purposes of the Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Act, the definitions found in sections 44-4204 to 44-4215.02 shall be used.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 862, § 21;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 360, § 21;

Laws 2004, LB 1047, § 10.